Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4027
Contraband.

(1) Any tobacco products that have been sold, offered for sale, or possessed for sale in this state in violation of the Tobacco Products Tax Act are declared to be contraband goods and may be seized by the Tax Commissioner, by the commissioner's agents or employees, or by any peace officer of this state, when directed by the commissioner to do so, without a warrant.

(2) The Tax Commissioner may, upon satisfactory proof, direct the return of any confiscated tobacco products when the commissioner has reason to believe that the owner thereof has not willfully or intentionally evaded any tax imposed under section 77-4008.

(3) Any tobacco products forfeited to the state under this section shall be destroyed or used for law enforcement purposes and then destroyed. The cost of such seizure, forfeiture, and destruction shall be borne by the person from whom the products are seized.

(4) The Tax Commissioner, agents and employees of the commissioner, and any peace officer of this state, when acting pursuant to this section, shall not in any way be responsible in any court for the seizure or the confiscation of any tobacco products.

Laws 2025, LB9, § 19.